apertium-en-mt.mt.metadix
    <pardef n="/ta__vblex">
      <e><p><l>tajt</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajt</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tat</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajna</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajtu</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>taw</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajtx</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajtx</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiex</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tatx</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajnax</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajtux</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tawx</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nagħti</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħti</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jagħti</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħti</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nagħtu</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħtu</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jagħtu</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nagħtix</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħtix</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jagħtix</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħtix</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nagħtux</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tagħtux</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jagħtux</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>taw</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tax</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tawx</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>mogħti</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mogħtija</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mogħtijin</l><r>ta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/gie__vblex">
      <e><p><l>gejt</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejt</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gie</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>giet</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejna</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejtu</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gew</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejtx</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejtx</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>giex</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gietx</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejnax</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gejtux</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gewx</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nigi</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigi</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jigi</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigi</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nigu</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigu</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jigu</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nigix</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigix</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jigix</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigix</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nigux</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigux</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jigux</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ejja</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjew</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjax</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjewx</l><r>gie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ta"><par n="/ta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gie"><par n="/gie__vblex"/></e>
